Utah statutes.
17C-1-415.   Obligations of agencies that use tax increment to pay for communication infrastructure or facility.

An agency that uses tax increment on or after March 30, 2009 to pay for communication infrastructure or a communication facility:

(1)  may not make or grant any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to a provider of communication service with respect to the communication infrastructure or communication facility for which the tax increment is used; and

(2)  shall allow the communication infrastructure and facilities for which tax increment is used to be used by any other provider of communication service on a fair, equitable, and nondiscriminatory basis.

